Maryland, session 2025, HB0268.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
5–101.
A civil action at law shall be filed within three years from the date it accrues unless
another provision of the Code provides a different period of time within which an action
shall be commenced.
5–102.
(a) An action on one of the following specialties shall be filed within 12 years after
the cause of action accrues, or within 12 years from the date of the death of the last to die
of the principal debtor or creditor, whichever is sooner:
(1) Promissory note or other instrument under seal;
(2) Bond except a public officer’s bond;
(3) Judgment;
(4) Recognizance;
(5) Contract under seal; or
(6) Any other specialty.
(b) A payment of principal or interest on a specialty suspends the operation of
this section as to the specialty for three years after the date of payment.
(c) This section does not apply to:
(1) A specialty taken for the use of the State; [or]
(2) A deed of trust, mortgage, or promissory note that has been signed
under seal and secures or is secured by owner–occupied residential property, as defined in
§ 7–105.1 of the Real Property Article; OR
(3) A CONTRACT, INCLUDING A CONTRACT UNDER SEAL, OR A
PROMISSORY NOTE OR OTHER INSTRUMENT UNDER SEAL THAT IS:
(I) RELATED TO AN OBLIGATION OF A CONSUMER TO PAY
CONSUMER DEBT, AS DEFINED IN § 5–1201 OF THIS TITLE, THAT ARISES FROM
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 693
HOSPITAL SERVICES, AS DEFINED IN § 19–201 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL
ARTICLE; AND
(II) BETWEEN A CONSUMER AND A HOSPITAL, AS DEFINED IN §
19–301 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
5–1201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Consumer debt” means a secured or an unsecured debt that:
(1) Is for money owed or alleged to be owed; and
(2) Arises from a consumer transaction.
Article – Health – General
19–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) (1) “Hospital services” means:
(i) Inpatient hospital services as enumerated in Medicare
Regulation 42 C.F.R. § 409.10, as amended;
(ii) Emergency services, including services provided at a
freestanding medical facility licensed under Subtitle 3A of this title;
(iii) Outpatient services provided at a hospital;
(iv) Outpatient services, as specified by the Commission in
regulation, provided at a freestanding medical facility licensed under Subtitle 3A of this
title that has received:
1. A certificate of need under § 19–120(o)(1) of this title; or
2. An exemption from obtaining a certificate of need under §
19–120(o)(3) of this title; and
(v) Identified physician services for which a facility has
Commission–approved rates on June 30, 1985.
(2) “Hospital services” includes a hospital outpatient service:
– 3 –

Ch. 693 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) Of a hospital that, on or before June 1, 2015, is under a merged
asset hospital system;
(ii) That is designated as a part of another hospital under the same
merged asset hospital system to make it possible for the hospital outpatient service to
participate in the 340B Program under the federal Public Health Service Act; and
(iii) That complies with all federal requirements for the 340B
Program and applicable provisions of 42 C.F.R. § 413.65.
(3) “Hospital services” does not include:
(i) Outpatient renal dialysis services; or
(ii) Outpatient services provided at a limited service hospital as
defined in § 19–301 of this title, except for emergency services.
19–214.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Financial hardship” means medical debt, incurred by a family over a
12–month period, that exceeds 25% of family income.
(3) “Medical debt” means out–of–pocket expenses, [excluding] INCLUDING
co–payments, coinsurance, and deductibles, for medical costs [billed by a hospital].
(4) “MEDICALLY NECESSARY CARE” MEANS CARE THAT IS:
(I) DIRECTLY RELATED TO DIAGNOSTIC, PREVENTIVE,
CURATIVE, PALLIATIVE, REHABILITATIVE, OR AMELIORATIVE TREATMENT OF AN
ILLNESS, INJURY, DISABILITY, OR HEALTH CONDITION;
(II) CONSISTENT WITH ACCEPTED STANDARDS OF GOOD
MEDICAL PRACTICE; AND
(III) NOT PRIMARILY FOR THE CONVENIENCE OF THE PATIENT,
THE PATIENT’S FAMILY, OR THE PROVIDER.
(b) (1) The Commission shall require each acute care hospital and each chronic
care hospital in the State under the jurisdiction of the Commission to develop a financial
assistance policy for providing free and reduced–cost care to patients who lack health care
coverage or whose health care coverage does not pay the full cost of the hospital bill.
(2) The financial assistance policy shall provide, at a minimum:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 693
(i) Free medically necessary care to patients with family income at
or below 200% of the federal poverty level, calculated at the time of service or updated, as
appropriate, to account for any change in financial circumstances of the patient that occurs
within 240 days after the initial hospital bill is provided;
(ii) Reduced–cost medically necessary care to low–income patients
with family income above 200% of the federal poverty level, calculated at the time of service
or updated, as appropriate, to account for any change in financial circumstances of the
patient that occurs within 240 days after the initial hospital bill is provided;
(iii) [A payment plan that is available to uninsured patients with
family income between 200% and 500% of the federal poverty level] A DESCRIPTION OF
THE AVAILABILITY OF THE PAYMENT PLAN REQUIRED UNDER § 19–214.2(D) OF THIS
SUBTITLE; and
(iv) A mechanism for a patient to request the hospital to reconsider
the denial of free or reduced–cost care that includes in the request:
1. The Health Education and Advocacy Unit is available to
assist the patient or the patient’s authorized representative in filing and mediating a
reconsideration request; and
2. The address, phone number, facsimile number, e–mail
address, mailing address, and website of the Health Education and Advocacy Unit.
(3) (i) The Commission by regulation may establish income thresholds
higher than those under [paragraph] PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (4) of this subsection.
(ii) In establishing income thresholds that are higher than those
under paragraph (2) of this subsection for a hospital, the Commission shall take into
account:
1. The patient mix of the hospital;
2. The financial condition of the hospital;
3. The level of bad debt experienced by the hospital; and
4. The amount of charity care provided by the hospital.
(4) [(i)] Subject to [subparagraphs (ii) and (iii) of this paragraph]
INCOME THRESHOLDS SET UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, the
financial assistance policy required under this subsection shall provide reduced–cost
medically necessary care to patients with family income below 500% of the federal poverty
level who have a financial hardship.
– 5 –

Ch. 693 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(ii) A hospital may seek and the Commission may approve a family
income threshold that is different than the family income threshold under subparagraph
(i) of this paragraph.
(iii) In establishing a family income threshold that is different than
the family income threshold under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the Commission
shall take into account:
1. The median family income in the hospital’s service area;
2. The patient mix of the hospital;
3. The financial condition of the hospital;
4. The level of bad debt experienced by the hospital;
5. The amount of charity care provided by the hospital; and
6. Other relevant factors.]
(5) (I) If a patient is eligible for reduced–cost medically necessary care
under [paragraphs] PARAGRAPH (2)(ii) [and (4)] of this subsection, the hospital shall
[apply the reduction that is most favorable to the patient], AT A MINIMUM, REDUCE THE
PATIENT’S OUT–OF–POCKET EXPENSES FOR THE REGULATED HOSPITAL SERVICE:
1. FOR A PATIENT WITH FAMILY INCOME OF AT LEAST
201% BUT NOT MORE THAN 250% OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LEVEL, BY 75%; AND
2. FOR A PATIENT WITH FAMILY INCOME OF MORE THAN
250% BUT NOT MORE THAN 300% OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LEVEL, BY 60%.
(II) IF A PATIENT IS ELIGIBLE FOR REDUCED–COST MEDICALLY
NECESSARY CARE UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE HOSPITAL
SHALL, AT A MINIMUM, REDUCE THE PATIENT’S OUT–OF–POCKET EXPENSES FOR
THE REGULATED HOSPITAL SERVICE:
1. FOR A PATIENT WITH FAMILY INCOME OF AT LEAST
201% BUT NOT MORE THAN 250% OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LEVEL, BY 75%;
2. FOR A PATIENT WITH FAMILY INCOME OF MORE THAN
250% BUT NOT MORE THAN 300% OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LEVEL, BY 60%;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 693
3. FOR A PATIENT WITH FAMILY INCOME OF MORE THAN
300% BUT NOT MORE THAN 350% OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LEVEL, BY 50%;
4. FOR A PATIENT WITH FAMILY INCOME OF MORE THAN
350% BUT NOT MORE THAN 400% OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LEVEL, BY 45%;
5. FOR A PATIENT WITH FAMILY INCOME OF MORE THAN
400% BUT NOT MORE THAN 450% OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LEVEL, BY 40%; AND
6. FOR A PATIENT WITH FAMILY INCOME OF MORE THAN
450% BUT NOT MORE THAN 500% OF THE FEDERAL POVERTY LEVEL, BY 35%.
(6) If a patient has received reduced–cost medically necessary care due to
a financial hardship, the patient or any immediate family member of the patient living in
the same household:
(i) Shall remain eligible for reduced–cost medically necessary care
when seeking subsequent care at the same hospital during the 12–month period beginning
on the date on which the reduced–cost medically necessary care was initially received; and
(ii) To avoid an unnecessary duplication of the hospital’s
determination of eligibility for free and reduced–cost care, shall inform the hospital of the
patient’s or family member’s eligibility for the reduced–cost medically necessary care.
(7) The financial assistance policy required under this subsection shall
provide presumptive eligibility for free medically necessary care to a patient who is not
eligible for the Maryland Medical Assistance Program or Maryland Children’s Health
Program and:
(i) Lives in a household with [children] A CHILD WHO IS enrolled
in the free and reduced–cost meal program AND IS ELIGIBLE FOR THE PROGRAM BASED
ON THE HOUSEHOLD’S INCOME;
(ii) Receives benefits through the federal Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program;
(iii) Receives benefits through the State’s Energy Assistance
Program;
(iv) Receives benefits through the federal Special Supplemental Food
Program for Women, Infants, and Children; or
(v) Receives benefits from any other social service program as
determined by the Department and the Commission.
– 7 –

Ch. 693 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(8) (i) A hospital may consider only household monetary assets in
excess of $100,000 when determining eligibility for free and reduced–cost care under the
hospital’s financial assistance policy.
(ii) If a hospital considers household monetary assets under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, retirement assets that the Internal Revenue Service
has granted preferential tax treatment as a retirement account, including
deferred–compensation plans qualified under the Internal Revenue Code or nonqualified
deferred–compensation plans shall be excluded.
(9) (i) In determining the family income of a patient, a hospital shall
apply a definition of household size that consists of the patient and, at a minimum, the
following individuals:
1. A spouse, regardless of whether the patient and spouse
expect to file a joint federal or State tax return;
2. Biological children, adopted children, or stepchildren; and
3. Anyone for whom the patient claims a personal exemption
in a federal or State tax return.
(ii) For a patient who is a child, the household size shall consist of
the child and the following individuals:
1. Biological parents, adopted parents, or stepparents or
guardians;
2. Biological siblings, adopted siblings, or stepsiblings; and
3. Anyone for whom the patient’s parents or guardians claim
a personal exemption in a federal or State tax return.
(10) (I) A hospital shall provide notice of the hospital’s financial
assistance policy to the patient, the patient’s family, or the patient’s authorized
representative before discharging the patient and in each communication to the patient
regarding collection of the hospital bill.
(II) THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL STATE THAT THE PATIENT HAS UP TO 240 DAYS AFTER THE DAY
THE PATIENT RECEIVES THE INITIAL HOSPITAL BILL TO APPLY FOR FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE FROM THE HOSPITAL.
(III) 1. THE HOSPITAL SHALL ENSURE THAT THE PATIENT,
THE PATIENT’S FAMILY, OR THE PATIENT’S AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE SIGNS
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 693
AND DATES THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
TO ACKNOWLEDGE THE PATIENT’S RECEIPT OF THE NOTICE BEFORE DISCHARGING
THE PATIENT.
2. IF A PATIENT CHOOSES NOT TO APPLY FOR FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE, THE SIGNATURE SHALL INDICATE THAT THE PATIENT IS NOT APPLYING
ON THE DAY OF THE SIGNING BUT MAY APPLY WITHIN 240 DAYS IMMEDIATELY
FOLLOWING THE PATIENT’S RECEIPT OF THE INITIAL HOSPITAL BILL THE HOSPITAL
SHALL OBTAIN DOCUMENTATION ENSURING THAT THE PATIENT OR THE PATIENT’S
AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE ACKNOWLEDGES THE PATIENT’S RECEIPT OF THE
NOTICE BEFORE DISCHARGING THE PATIENT.
2. IF A PATIENT CHOOSES NOT TO APPLY FOR FINANCIAL
ASSISTANCE, THE PATIENT’S DOCUMENTED ACKNOWLEDGMENT SHALL INDICATE
THAT THE PATIENT IS NOT APPLYING ON THE DAY OF THE ACKNOWLEDGMENT BUT
MAY APPLY WITHIN 240 DAYS IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING THE PATIENT’S RECEIPT
OF THE INITIAL HOSPITAL BILL.
(11) THE HOSPITAL SHALL CONSIDER ANY CHANGE IN THE PATIENT’S
FINANCIAL CIRCUMSTANCE THAT OCCURS DURING THE 240–DAY PERIOD
FOLLOWING THE PATIENT’S RECEIPT OF THE INITIAL HOSPITAL BILL IF THE
PATIENT INFORMS THE HOSPITAL OF THE CHANGE IN FINANCIAL CIRCUMSTANCE
ON OR BEFORE THE CONCLUSION OF THE 240–DAY PERIOD.
(c) (1) A hospital shall post a notice in conspicuous places throughout the
hospital, including the billing office, informing patients of their right to apply for financial
assistance and who to contact at the hospital for additional information.
(2) The notice required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall:
(i) Be in simplified language in at least 10 point type; and
(ii) Be provided in the patient’s preferred language or, if no preferred
language is specified, each language spoken by a limited English proficient population that
constitutes at least 5% of the overall population within the city or county in which the
hospital is located as measured by the most recent census.
(d) The Commission shall:
(1) Develop a uniform financial assistance application; and
(2) Require each hospital to use the uniform financial assistance
application to determine eligibility for free and reduced–cost care under the hospital’s
financial assistance policy.
– 9 –

Ch. 693 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(e) The uniform financial assistance application:
(1) Shall be written in simplified language; and
(2) May not require documentation that presents an undue barrier to a
patient’s receipt of financial assistance.
(f) (1) Each hospital shall develop an information sheet that:
(i) Describes the hospital’s financial assistance policy and includes
a section that allows for a patient to initial that the patient has been made aware of the
financial assistance policy;
(ii) Describes a patient’s rights and obligations with regard to
hospital billing and collection under the law;
(iii) Provides contact information for the individual or office at the
hospital that is available to assist the patient, the patient’s family, or the patient’s
authorized representative in order to understand:
1. The patient’s hospital bill;
2. The patient’s rights and obligations with regard to the
hospital bill;
3. How to apply for free and reduced–cost care; and
4. How to apply for the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program and any other programs that may help pay the bill;
(iv) Provides contact information for the Maryland Medical
Assistance Program;
(v) Includes a statement that physician charges are not included in
the hospital bill and are billed separately; and
(vi) Informs patients of the right to request and receive a written
estimate of the total charges for hospital nonemergency services, procedures, and supplies
that reasonably are expected to be provided for professional services by the hospital.
(2) The information sheet shall:
(i) Be in simplified language in at least 10 point type; and
(ii) Be in the patient’s preferred language or, if no preferred
language is specified, each language spoken by a limited English proficient population that
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 693
constitutes at least 5% of the overall population within the city or county in which the
hospital is located as measured by the most recent census.
(3) The information sheet shall be provided to the patient, the patient’s
family, or the patient’s authorized representative:
(i) Before discharge;
(ii) With the hospital bill;
(iii) On request; and
(iv) In each written communication to the patient regarding
collection of the hospital bill.
(4) The hospital bill shall include a reference to the information sheet.
(5) The Commission shall:
(i) Establish uniform requirements for the information sheet; and
(ii) Review each hospital’s implementation of and compliance with
the requirements of this subsection.
(g) Each hospital shall ensure the availability of staff who are trained to work
with the patient, the patient’s family, and the patient’s authorized representative in order
to understand:
(1) The patient’s hospital bill;
(2) The patient’s rights and obligations with regard to the hospital bill,
including the patient’s rights and obligations with regard to reduced–cost medically
necessary care due to a financial hardship;
(3) How to apply for the Maryland Medical Assistance Program and any
other programs that may help pay the hospital bill; and
(4) How to contact the hospital for additional assistance.
(h) Each hospital shall develop a procedure to determine a patient’s eligibility
under the hospital’s financial assistance policy in which the hospital:
(1) Determines whether the patient has health insurance;
(2) Determines whether the patient is presumptively eligible for free or
reduced–cost care under subsection (b)(7) of this section;
– 11 –

Ch. 693 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) Determines whether uninsured patients are eligible for public or
private health insurance;
(4) To the extent practicable, offers assistance to uninsured patients if the
patient chooses to apply for public or private health insurance;
(5) To the extent practicable, determines whether the patient is eligible for
other public programs that may assist with health care costs;
(6) Uses information in the possession of the hospital, if available, to
determine whether the patient is qualified for free or reduced–cost care under the hospital’s
financial assistance policy; and
(7) When a patient submits a completed application for financial
assistance, determines the patient’s eligibility under the hospital’s financial assistance
policy within 14 days after the patient applies for financial assistance and suspends any
billing or collections actions while eligibility is being determined.
(i) A hospital may not:
(1) Use a patient’s citizenship or immigration status as an eligibility
requirement for financial assistance; or
(2) Withhold financial assistance or deny a patient’s application for
financial assistance on the basis of race, color, religion, ancestry or national origin, sex, age,
marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, genetic information, or on the basis of
disability.
(j) Each hospital shall submit to the Commission annually at times prescribed by
the Commission:
(1) The hospital’s financial assistance policy developed under this section;
and
(2) An annual report on the hospital’s financial assistance policy that
includes:
(i) The total number of patients who completed or partially
completed an application for financial assistance during the prior year;
(ii) The total number of inpatients and outpatients who received:
1. Free care during the immediately preceding year; and
2. Reduced–cost care for the prior year;
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 693
(iii) The total number of patients who received financial assistance
during the immediately preceding year by race or ethnicity and gender;
(iv) The total number of patients who were denied financial
assistance during the immediately preceding year by race or ethnicity and gender;
(v) The total amount of the costs of hospital services provided to
patients who received free care; and
(vi) The total amount of the costs of hospital services provided to
patients who received reduced–cost care that was either covered by the hospital as financial
assistance or that the hospital charged to the patient.
(k) (1) The Commission shall post on its website each hospital’s financial
assistance policy and annual report.
(2) The Commission shall compile the reports required under subsection (j)
of this section and issue a hospital financial assistance report.
(3) The hospital financial assistance report required under paragraph (2)
of this subsection shall be made available to the public free of charge.
(4) On or before December 1 each year, the Commission shall submit a copy
of the annual hospital financial assistance report issued under paragraph (2) of this
subsection, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the Senate
Finance Committee and the House Health and Government Operations Committee.
19–214.2.
(a) (1) Each hospital annually shall submit to the Commission:
(i) At times prescribed by the Commission, the hospital’s policy on
the collection of debts owed by patients; and
(ii) A report including:
1. The total number of patients by race or ethnicity, gender,
and zip code of residence against whom the hospital, or a debt collector used by the hospital,
filed an action to collect a debt owed on a hospital bill;
2. The total number of patients by race or ethnicity, gender,
and zip code of residence with respect to whom the hospital has and has not reported or
classified a bad debt; and
– 13 –

Ch. 693 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. The total dollar amount of the charges for hospital services
provided to patients but not collected by the hospital for patients covered by insurance,
including the out–of–pocket costs for patients covered by insurance, and patients without
insurance.
(2) The Commission shall post the information submitted under paragraph
(1) of this subsection on its website.
(b) The policy submitted under subsection (a)(1) of this section shall:
(1) Provide for active oversight by the hospital of any contract for collection
of debts on behalf of the hospital;
(2) Prohibit the hospital from selling any debt;
(3) [Prohibit the charging of interest on bills incurred by self–pay patients
before a court judgment is obtained;
(4)] Describe in detail the consideration by the hospital of patient income,
assets, and other criteria;
[(5)] (4) Prohibit the hospital from reporting ADVERSE INFORMATION
to a consumer reporting agency [or];
(5) PROHIBIT THE HOSPITAL FROM filing a civil action to collect a debt
within [180] 240 days after the initial bill is provided;
(6) PROHIBIT THE HOSPITAL FROM FILING A CIVIL ACTION TO
COLLECT A DEBT AGAINST A PATIENT WHOSE OUTSTANDING DEBT IS AT OR BELOW
$500;
[(6)] (7) Describe the hospital’s procedures for collecting a debt;
[(7)] (8) Describe the circumstances in which the hospital will seek a
judgment against a patient;
[(8)] (9) In accordance with subsection (c) of this section, provide for a
refund of amounts collected from a patient or the guarantor of a patient who was later
found to be eligible for free care within 240 days after the initial bill was provided;
[(9)] (10) If the hospital has obtained a judgment against or reported
adverse information to a consumer reporting agency about a patient who later was found
to be eligible for free care within 240 days after the initial bill was provided for which the
judgment was awarded or the adverse information was reported, require the hospital to
seek to vacate the judgment or strike the adverse information;
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 693
[(10)] (11) Provide a mechanism for a patient to:
(i) Request the hospital to reconsider the denial of free or
reduced–cost care;
(ii) File with the hospital a complaint against the hospital or a debt
collector used by the hospital regarding the handling of the patient’s bill; and
(iii) Allow the patient and the hospital to mutually agree to modify
the terms of a payment plan offered under subsection [(e)] (D) of this section or entered
into with the patient; and
[(11)] (12) [Prohibit] FOR A PATIENT WHO IS ELIGIBLE FOR FREE OR
REDUCED–COST CARE UNDER THE HOSPITAL’S FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE POLICY,
PROHIBIT the hospital from [collecting additional]:
(I) CHARGING INTEREST ON THE DEBT OWED ON A BILL FOR
THE PATIENT BEFORE A COURT JUDGMENT IS OBTAINED; OR
(II) COLLECTING fees [in an] OR ANY OTHER amount that exceeds
the approved charge for the hospital service as established by the Commission [for which
the medical debt is owed on a bill for a patient who is eligible for free or reduced–cost care
under the hospital’s financial assistance policy] OR A PROFESSIONAL FEE.
(c) (1) (I) [Beginning October 1, 2010, a] A hospital shall provide for a
refund of amounts exceeding $25 collected from a patient or the guarantor of a patient
who[, within a 2–year period after the date of service,] was found to be eligible for free care
[on the date of service] WITHIN 240 DAYS AFTER THE INITIAL BILL IS PROVIDED TO
THE PATIENT.
(II) THE HOSPITAL SHALL PROVIDE THE REFUND TO THE
PATIENT NOT LATER THAN 30 DAYS AFTER DETERMINING THAT THE PATIENT WAS
ELIGIBLE FOR FREE CARE.
(2) [A hospital may reduce the 2–year period under paragraph (1) of this
subsection to no less than 30 days after the date the hospital requests information from a
patient, or the guarantor of a patient, to determine the patient’s eligibility for free care at
the time of service, if the hospital documents the lack of cooperation of the patient or the
guarantor of a patient in providing the requested information.
(3)] If a patient is enrolled in a means–tested government health care plan
that requires the patient to pay out–of–pocket for hospital services, a hospital’s refund
policy shall provide for a refund that complies with the terms of the patient’s plan.
– 15 –

Ch. 693 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(d) A hospital may not charge interest or fees on any debt incurred on or after the
date of service by a patient who is eligible for free or reduced–cost care under § 19–214.1 of
this subtitle.]
[(e)] (D) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, a hospital shall
provide in writing to each patient who incurs medical debt information about the
availability of an installment payment plan for the debt.
(2) A hospital shall provide the information under paragraph (1) of this
subsection to the patient, the patient’s family, the patient’s authorized representative, or
the patient’s legal guardian:
(i) Before the patient is discharged;
(ii) With the hospital bill;
(iii) On request; and
(iv) In each written communication to the patient regarding
collection of hospital debt.
(3) (i) The Commission shall develop guidelines, with input from
stakeholders, for an income–based payment plan offered under this subsection that
includes:
1. The amount of medical debt owed to the hospital;
2. The duration of the payment plan based on a patient’s
annual gross income;
3. Guidelines for requiring appropriate documentation of
income level;
4. Guidelines for the payment amount that:
A. May not exceed 5% of the [individual] patient’s federal or
State adjusted gross monthly HOUSEHOLD income THAT TAKES INTO CONSIDERATION
ALL INDIVIDUALS ON THE SAME FEDERAL OR STATE TAX RETURN; and
B. Shall consider financial hardship, as defined in §
19–214.1(a) of this subtitle;
5. Guidelines for:
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 693
A. The determination of possible interest payments for
patients who do not qualify for free or reduced–cost care, which may not begin before [180]
240 days after the [due date of the first payment] INITIAL BILL IS PROVIDED; and
B. A prohibition on interest payments for patients who
qualify for free or reduced–cost care AS REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(12) OF THIS
SECTION;
6. Guidelines for modification of a payment plan that does
not create a greater financial burden on the patient; and
7. A prohibition on penalties or fees for prepayment or early
payment.
(ii) A hospital may not seek legal action against a patient on a debt
owed until the hospital has established and implemented a payment plan policy that
complies with the guidelines developed under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(4) (i) A patient shall be deemed to be compliant with a payment plan
if the patient makes at least 11 scheduled monthly payments within a 12–month period.
(ii) If a patient misses a scheduled monthly payment, the patient
shall contact the health care facility and identify a plan to make up the missed payment
within 1 year after the date of the missed payment.
(iii) The health care facility may, but may not be required to, waive
any additional missed payments that occur within a 12–month period and allow the patient
to continue to participate in the income–based payment plan and not refer the outstanding
balance owed to a collection agency or for legal action.
(5) (i) A hospital shall demonstrate that it attempted in good faith to
meet the requirements of this subsection and the guidelines developed by the Commission
under paragraph (3) of this subsection before the hospital:
1. Files an action to collect a debt owed on a hospital bill by
a patient; or
2. Delegates collection activity to a debt collector for a debt
owed on a hospital bill by a patient.
(ii) Subparagraph (i) of this paragraph does not prohibit a hospital
from using an eligibility vendor to provide outreach to a patient for purposes of assisting
the patient in qualifying for financial assistance.
– 17 –

Ch. 693 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(f)] (E) (1) For at least [180] 240 days after [issuing an] THE initial patient
bill WAS PROVIDED, a hospital may not report adverse information about a patient to a
consumer reporting agency or commence civil action against a patient for nonpayment.
(2) A hospital shall report the fulfillment of a patient’s payment obligation
within 60 days after the obligation is fulfilled to any consumer reporting agency to which
the hospital had reported adverse information about the patient.
(3) A hospital may not report adverse information to a consumer reporting
agency regarding a patient who at the time of service was uninsured or eligible for free or
reduced–cost care under § 19–214.1 of this subtitle.
(4) A hospital may not report adverse information about a patient to a
consumer reporting agency, commence a civil action against a patient for nonpayment, or
delegate collection activity to a debt collector:
(i) If the hospital was notified in accordance with federal law by the
patient or the insurance carrier that an appeal or a review of a health insurance decision
is pending within the immediately preceding 60 days; or
(ii) If the hospital [has completed] IS PROCESSING a requested
reconsideration of the denial of free or reduced–cost care that was appropriately completed
by the patient OR HAS COMPLETED THE RECONSIDERATION within the immediately
preceding 60 days.
(5) If a hospital has reported adverse information about a patient to a
consumer reporting agency, the hospital shall instruct the consumer reporting agency to
delete the adverse information about the patient:
(i) If the hospital was informed by the patient or the insurance
carrier that an appeal or a review of a health insurance decision is pending, and until 60
days after the appeal is complete; or
(ii) Until 60 days after the hospital has completed a requested
reconsideration of the denial of free or reduced–cost care.
[(g)] (F) (1) A hospital may not force the sale or foreclosure of a patient’s
primary residence to collect a debt owed on a hospital bill.
(2) A hospital may not request a lien against a patient’s primary residence
in an action to collect debt owed on a hospital bill.
(3) (i) A hospital may not [file an action against a patient to collect a
debt owed on a hospital bill or] give notice to a patient under subsection [(i)] (H) of this
section until after [180] 240 days after the initial bill was provided.
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 693
(ii) If a hospital files an action to collect the debt owed on a hospital
bill, the hospital may not request the issuance of or otherwise knowingly take action that
would cause a court to issue:
1. A body attachment against a patient; or
2. An arrest warrant against a patient.
(4) A hospital may not request a writ of garnishment of wages or file an
action that would result in an attachment of wages against a patient to collect debt owed
on a hospital bill if the patient is eligible for free or reduced–cost care under § 19–214.1 of
this subtitle.
(5) (i) A hospital may not make a claim against the estate of a deceased
patient to collect a debt owed on a hospital bill if the deceased patient was known by the
hospital to be eligible for free care under § 19–214.1 of this subtitle or if the value of the
estate after tax obligations are fulfilled is less than half of the debt owed.
(ii) A hospital may offer the family of the deceased patient the ability
to apply for financial assistance.
(6) A hospital may not file an action to collect a debt owed on a hospital bill
by a patient until the hospital determines whether the patient is eligible for free or
reduced–cost care under § 19–214.1 of this subtitle.
[(h)] (G) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a spouse
or another individual may not be held liable for the debt owed on a hospital bill of an
individual who is at least 18 years old.
(2) An individual may voluntarily consent to assume liability for the debt
owed on a hospital bill of any other individual if the consent is:
(i) Made on a separate document signed by the individual;
(ii) Not solicited in an emergency room or during an emergency
situation; and
(iii) Not required as a condition of providing any emergency or
nonemergency health care services.
[(i)] (H) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, at least 45 days before
filing an action against a patient to collect on the debt owed on a hospital bill, a hospital
shall send written notice of the intent to file an action to the patient.
(2) The notice required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall:
– 19 –

Ch. 693 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) Be sent to the patient by certified mail and first–class mail;
(ii) Be in simplified language and in at least 10 point type;
(iii) Include:
1. The name and telephone number of:
A. The hospital;
B. If applicable, the debt collector; and
C. An agent of the hospital authorized to modify the terms of
the payment plan, if any;
2. The amount required to cure the nonpayment of debt,
including past due payments, INTEREST, penalties, and fees;
3. A statement recommending that the patient seek debt
counseling services;
4. Telephone numbers and Internet addresses of the Health
Education Advocacy Unit in the Office of the Attorney General, available to assist patients
experiencing medical debt;
5. An explanation of the hospital’s financial assistance
policy; and
6. Any other relevant information prescribed by the
Commission; and
(iv) Be provided in the patient’s preferred language or, if no preferred
language is specified, each language spoken by a limited English proficient population that
constitutes at least 5% of the population within the jurisdiction in which the hospital is
located as measured by the most recent federal census.
(3) The notice required under this subsection shall be accompanied by:
(i) An application for financial assistance under the hospital’s
financial assistance policy, along with instructions for completing the application for
financial assistance, and the telephone number to call to confirm receipt of the application;
(ii) The availability of [a] AN INCOME–BASED payment plan to
satisfy the medical debt that is the subject of the hospital debt collection action; and
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 693
(iii) The information sheet required under § 19–214.1(f) of this
subtitle.
[(j)] (I) A complaint by a hospital in an action to collect a debt owed on a
hospital bill by a patient shall:
(1) Include an affidavit stating:
(i) The date on which the [180–day] 240–DAY period required
under subsection [(g)(3)] (F)(3) of this section elapsed and the nature of the nonpayment;
(ii) That a notice of intent to file an action under subsection [(i)] (H)
of this section:
1. Was sent to the patient and the date on which the notice
was sent; and
2. Accurately reflected the contents required to be included
in the notice;
(iii) That the hospital provided:
1. The patient with a copy of the information sheet on the
financial assistance policy in accordance with subsection [(i)(3)(ii)] (H)(3)(II) of this
section; and
2. Notice of the financial assistance policy as documented
under § 19–214.1(f) of this subtitle;
(iv) That the hospital made a determination regarding whether the
patient is eligible for the hospital’s financial assistance policy in accordance with § 19–214.1
of this subtitle; and
(v) That the hospital made a good–faith effort to meet the
requirements of subsection [(e)] (D) of this section; and
(2) Be accompanied by:
(i) The original or a certified copy of the hospital bill;
(ii) A statement of the remaining due and payable debt supported by
an affidavit of the plaintiff, the hospital, or the agent or attorney of the plaintiff or hospital;
(iii) A copy of the most recent hospital bill sent to the patient;
– 21 –

Ch. 693 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iv) If the defendant is eligible for federal Service Members Civil
Relief Act benefits, an affidavit that the hospital is in compliance with the Act;
(v) A copy of the notice of intent to file an action on a hospital bill;
and
(vi) A copy of the patient’s signed certified mail acknowledgment of
receipt of the written notice of intent to file an action, if received by the hospital.
[(k)] (J) If a hospital delegates collection activity to a debt collector, the hospital
shall:
(1) Specify the collection activity to be performed by the debt collector
through an explicit authorization or contract;
(2) Require the debt collector to abide by the hospital’s credit and collection
policy;
(3) Specify procedures the debt collector must follow if a patient appears to
qualify for financial assistance; and
(4) Require the debt collector to:
(i) In accordance with the hospital’s policy, provide a mechanism for
a patient to file with the hospital a complaint against the hospital or the debt collector
regarding the handling of the patient’s bill;
(ii) Forward the complaint to the hospital if a patient files a
complaint with the debt collector; and
(iii) Along with the hospital, be jointly and severally responsible for
meeting the requirements of this section.
[(l)] (K) (1) The board of directors of each hospital shall review and approve
the HOSPITAL’S financial assistance POLICY REQUIRED UNDER § 19–214.1 OF THIS
SUBTITLE and debt collection [policies of the hospital] POLICY REQUIRED UNDER THIS
SECTION at least every 2 years.
(2) A hospital may not alter its financial assistance or debt collection
policies without approval by the board of directors.
[(m)] (L) The Commission shall review each hospital’s implementation of and
compliance with the hospital’s policies and the requirements of this section.
– 22 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 693
[(n)] (M) (1) On or before February 1 each year, beginning in 2023, the
Commission shall compile the information required under subsection (a) of this section and
prepare a medical debt collection report based on the compiled information.
(2) The report required under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be:
(i) Made available to the public free of charge; and
(ii) Submitted to the Senate Finance Committee and the House
Health and Government Operations Committee in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article.
19–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) “Hospital” means an institution that:
(1) Has a group of at least 5 physicians who are organized as a medical
staff for the institution;
(2) Maintains facilities to provide, under the supervision of the medical
staff, diagnostic and treatment services for 2 or more unrelated individuals; and
(3) Admits or retains the individuals for overnight care.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 23 –